Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2704
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that violations of sections 69-2702 and 69-2703 threaten the integrity of the tobacco Master Settlement Agreement, the fiscal soundness of the state, and the public health. The Legislature finds that enacting procedural enhancements will aid the enforcement of sections 69-2702 and 69-2703 and thereby safeguard the Master Settlement Agreement, the fiscal soundness of the state, and the public health.

Laws 2003, LB 572, § 1.